Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 1 State Employees’ Health Insurance Plan
45-18-7.7.
Employees and dependents of critical access hospitals in health plans.

The board is authorized to contract with any public or nonprofit critical access hospital that meets such requirements as the department may establish for the inclusion of the employees and dependents of such critical access hospitals in any health plan established under this part. It shall be the duty of such critical access hospital to deduct from the salary or other remuneration or otherwise collect such payment from its qualified employees as may be required under the board’s regulations. In addition, it shall be the duty of such critical access hospital to make the employer contributions required for the operation of such plan. Should any critical access hospital fail to remit such deductions or such employer contributions to the board, the commissioner may, upon written notice to such critical access hospital, terminate the coverage for such employees as of the day following the last day for which such deductions or such employer contributions were remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

The board is authorized to contract with any federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 1395x(aa)(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code Annotated, that meets such requirements as the department may establish for the inclusion of the employees and dependents of such federally qualified health centers in any health plan established under this part. It shall be the duty of the federally qualified health center to deduct from the salary or other remuneration or otherwise collect such payment from its qualified employees as may be required under the board’s regulations. In addition, it shall be the duty of such federally qualified health center to make the employer contributions required by the board for the operation of such plan. The department shall make a determination, no later than January 1, 2005, as to whether a federally qualified health center is an agency or instrumentality of the State of Georgia. In the event that the department determines that such centers are agencies or instrumentalities of the State of Georgia, then all employees and dependents of such centers shall be eligible for inclusion in the state employees’ health insurance plan. Should any such federally qualified health center fail to remit such deductions or such employer contributions to the board, the commissioner may, upon written notice to such federally qualified health center, terminate the coverage for such employees as of the day following the last day for which such deductions or such employer contributions were remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

The authority granted to the board pursuant to Code Sections 45-18-5.1, 45-18-5.2, 45-18-7.1, 45-18-7.3, 45-18-7.5, and 45-18-7.6; by this Code section; or by any other provision of this part may be exercised only upon a determination by the department that the employer is an agency or instrumentality of the State of Georgia or, if the department determines that such entities are not agencies or instrumentalities of the State of Georgia, then employees and dependents of such entities may be included in the state employees’ health insurance plan up to the point that such health plan would not be able to retain its exempt status under the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-7.7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1240, § 6-1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 444, § 3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 9/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 45/HB 142.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “45-18-7.6; by this Code section;” was substituted for “45-18-7.6, by this Code section,” in subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 444, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that federally qualified health centers, as defined in Section 1395x(aa)(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code Annotated, promote and preserve the provision of primary care to the residents of Georgia, particularly residents in rural areas of Georgia. Steps must be taken to promote the continued existence of the federally qualified health centers in order to promote the availability of primary health care to Georgia’s rural citizens.”

Ga. L. 2004, p. 444, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly further finds that the state employees’ health insurance plan is a governmental plan exempt from the regulatory requirements of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 and declares that it is the public policy of the State of Georgia that the Board of Community Health take all steps necessary and proper to ensure that said exemption is retained by the state.”

45-18-7.8.
Employees of the Georgia Student Finance Authority.

The board is authorized to contract with the Georgia Student Finance Authority for the inclusion in any health insurance plan or plans established under this part of the employees of the Georgia Student Finance Authority and their spouses and dependent children, as defined by the regulations of the board. It shall be the duty of the Georgia Student Finance Authority to deduct from the salary or other remuneration of its employees such payment as may be required under the board’s regulations. In addition, it shall be the duty of the Georgia Student Finance Authority to make the employer contributions required for the operation of such plan or plans.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-7.8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 858, § 1/SB 363.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, “this part” was substituted for “this article” in the first sentence of this Code section.

45-18-8.
Right of employees to secure coverage for spouse and dependents; regulations.

Upon agreeing to pay his contribution to the cost of such coverage, each employee shall be entitled to have his spouse and dependent children, as defined by the regulations of the board, included in the coverage. The board shall adopt regulations governing the discontinuance and resumption by employees of coverage for dependents.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 8.

45-18-9.
Continuation of coverage for spouse or dependents of deceased employees; resumption of coverage; payment of contributions; regulating continuance, discontinuance, and resumption of coverage.

At the time of death of any employee, annuitant, or other person who is the primary or principal beneficiary of said contract or contracts for health insurance and who dies on or after March 1, 1966, having at least 13 years and four months of creditable service as determined pursuant to Chapter 2 of Title 47, any spouse or dependent child or children included in the coverage of the contract or contracts for health insurance as provided in this part may be entitled to continue such coverage upon agreeing to pay contributions to the cost of such coverage as may be provided by rules and regulations of the board. The board shall be authorized to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations governing the continuance, discontinuance, and resumption of coverage by any such spouse or dependent child or children.

At the time of death of any employee, annuitant, or other person who was the primary or principal beneficiary of said contract or contracts for health insurance and who died during the period from July 1, 1962, to and including April 30, 1966, any spouse or dependent child or children included in the coverage of the contract or contracts for health insurance as provided in this part may be entitled to resume such coverage upon agreeing to pay contributions to the cost of such coverage as may be provided by rules and regulations of the board. The board may promulgate and adopt rules and regulations governing the resumption, continuance, and discontinuance of coverage by any such spouse or dependent child or children.

At the time of death of any employee, annuitant, or other person who is the primary or principal beneficiary of said contract or contracts for health insurance pursuant to Chapter 8 of Title 47, or as determined pursuant to Chapter 9, 12, or 13 of Title 47, any annuitant included in the coverage of the contract or contracts for health insurance as provided in this part may be entitled to continue such coverage upon agreeing to pay contributions to the cost of such coverage as may be provided by rules and regulations of the board. The board shall be authorized to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations governing the continuance, discontinuance, and resumption of coverage by any such spouse or dependent child or children.

The surviving spouse and covered dependents of any retired employee who are included in the contract or contracts for health insurance coverage under this part shall be eligible to continue such coverage after the death of the retired employee upon agreeing to pay employee premiums for such coverage in accordance with the rules and regulations of the board. The board is authorized and directed to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations governing the continuance, discontinuance, or resumption of coverage by any such surviving spouse and covered dependents. This subsection shall not apply unless the parties have been married at least one full year prior to the death of the retired employee; and coverage shall cease for the covered spouse upon the occurrence of any event, other than the death of the retired employee, which would render the surviving spouse ineligible for continued coverage under the contract. For purposes of the immediately preceding sentence relating to covered spouses, the remarriage of the surviving spouse shall be considered to be the same as a divorce from the retired employee for purposes of determining the spouse’s eligibility.

If any employee of this state is killed while acting within the scope of his or her employment or receives bodily injury while acting within the scope of his or her employment that directly results in death thereafter, eligible dependents may continue coverage, provided that:

The deceased employee was the primary or principal beneficiary of any contract or contracts for health insurance established under this part;

At the time of death, the employee included his or her eligible dependents under such contract or contracts for health insurance;

At the time of death, the employee maintained continuous coverage during the period between injury and death;

The eligible dependents agree to pay the contributions to the cost of such coverage; and

The eligible dependents pay such contributions in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated and adopted by the board governing the continuance, discontinuance, and resumption of coverage by such eligible dependents; provided, however, that, on and after May 11, 2011, any eligible dependents of a deceased employee of this state killed in the line of duty who are receiving continued coverage or who elect to continue coverage pursuant to this subsection shall be entitled to continue such coverage under the health insurance plan established pursuant to this part upon agreeing to pay contributions at the same rate as required for state employees and in compliance with the rules and regulations governing such coverage.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1927, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 9, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 94, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 983, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1411, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 478, § 1/HB 107.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section §

28-9-5

, in 2011, “May 11, 2011” was substituted for “the effective date of this clause” in paragraph (e)(5).

45-18-10.
Right of continuation of coverage for former employees; payment of premiums; establishment of terms and conditions by board; appointment as United States attorney.

Any other provision of this part to the contrary notwithstanding, on and after July 1, 1978, any employee who resigns from employment or who fails to be reelected or who does not seek reelection to office and who at the time he or she leaves office or employment has completed eight or more years of service as an employee, as defined in Code Section 45-18-1, shall be entitled to continue full coverage and participation, including coverage for his or her spouse and dependent children, in the health insurance plan upon the payment of a monthly premium to be fixed by the board; and, in addition thereto, any member of the General Assembly who ceases to hold office as such at any time after July 1, 1981, and who was eligible to retire at the time of leaving office, except for the attainment of retirement age, pursuant to a public retirement system created by law to which the General Assembly appropriates funds, and who does not withdraw employee contributions from such public retirement system, shall be entitled to continue full coverage and participation, including coverage for the spouse and dependent children of such person, in the health insurance plan by continuing to pay to the board the monthly premium which is paid by an active state employee. The first monthly premium provided for in this Code section must be paid within 30 days following receipt of a notice of premium to be sent to such person by the board. If such premium is not paid within such time limit, such insurance coverage shall be canceled and such person shall not again be eligible to participate in such plan. This Code section shall not affect the rights otherwise available under this part to retired employees and their spouses and dependents. The board is authorized to establish terms and conditions for participation which the board shall deem appropriate and which are not in conflict with this Code section.

Subject to such rules as the office may establish, any district attorney or assistant district attorney who ceases to hold office as such in order to accept appointment as a United States attorney or assistant United States attorney, who was eligible to retire at the time of leaving office, except for the attainment of retirement age, pursuant to a public retirement system created by law to which the General Assembly appropriates funds, and did not withdraw employee contributions from such public retirement system, who declines coverage under this plan in order to be covered under a health benefit plan available to federal employees, and who ceases to hold such position with the federal government without having vested in any retirement system for federal employees may be permitted to reestablish full coverage and participation, including coverage for the spouse and dependent children of such person, in the health insurance plan by notifying the board within 90 days of ceasing to be employed by the federal government or by August 1, 1998, whichever is later, that he or she desires to resume coverage in the health insurance plan and by paying to the board the monthly premium which is paid by an active state employee.

Any other provision of this part to the contrary notwithstanding, any employee who is injured by an act of inmate violence while he or she is employed as a correctional officer in a correctional facility in this state and is five years or less from becoming eligible for medicare medical coverage shall be exempt from the eight or more years of service requirement and shall be entitled to continue full coverage and participation, including coverage for his or her spouse and dependent children, in the health insurance plan upon the payment of the monthly premium fixed by the board for active state employees. The first monthly premium provided for in this subsection must be paid within 30 days following receipt of a notice of premium to be sent to such person by the commissioner. If such premium is not paid within such time limit, such insurance coverage shall be canceled and such person shall not again be eligible to participate in such plan.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1927, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 983, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 823, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1094, § 3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 10/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1007, § 1/HB 1126; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

45-18-11.
Procedure for presentation of claims and payment of benefits.

Any benefits payable under the plan may be made either directly to the attending physicians, hospitals, medical groups, or others furnishing the services upon which a claim is based or to the covered employee, upon presentation of valid bills for such services, subject to such provisions to facilitate payment as may be made by the board.

The claims must be presented in writing to the board or its designee within two years from the date the service was rendered or else no benefits will be owed or paid.

All drafts or checks issued by the board or the board’s designee shall be void if not presented and accepted by the drawer’s bank within six months of the date the draft or check was drawn. If the payee or member does not present the draft or check for acceptance during the seven years following the date the draft or check was issued, the draft or check will be void, funds will be retained in the insurance fund, and further payments for such claim will not be owed or paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 9; Ga. L. 1979, p. 667, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 397, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments regarding Georgia’s insurance laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 117 (1979).

45-18-12.
Creation of health insurance fund; amounts credited to fund; special reserve; administrator and custodian of fund.

There is created a health insurance fund which shall be available without fiscal year limitations for premium, subscription charge, benefits, and administration costs. The amounts withheld from employees and retired employees under this part, all amounts contributed by the state or from federal funds to such health insurance fund, and all amounts contributed by any state authority pursuant to this part shall be credited to such health insurance fund. All other income, as well as the income derived from any dividends, premium rate adjustments, or other refunds under any contract or contracts, shall be credited to and constitute a part of such fund. Any amounts remaining in such fund after all premiums or subscription charges and other expenses have been paid shall be retained in such fund as a special reserve for adverse fluctuation. The commissioner of community health shall be executive officer of the Board of Community Health for the administration of this part and custodian of such health insurance fund and shall be responsible under a properly approved bond for all moneys coming into said fund and paid out of said fund as may be required to be paid to any contracting corporation under any contract entered into pursuant to this part and to cover administrative costs.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner may combine the fund provided for in this Code section with the funds provided for in Code Section 20-2-891 and Code Section 20-2-918.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 10; Ga. L. 1962, p. 51, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 23; Ga. L. 2005, p. 623, § 6/SB 284; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

45-18-13.
Deposit of amounts from health insurance fund available for investment in trust account; investment of funds; withdrawal of funds from trust account.

Any amounts held by the health insurance fund which are available for investment shall be paid over to the Office of the State Treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit said funds in a trust account for credit only to the health insurance fund. The state treasurer shall invest these health insurance funds subject to the limitations of Code Section 50-5A-7 and Chapter 17 of Title 50. All income derived from said investments shall accrue to the health insurance fund. When moneys are paid over to the Office of the State Treasurer as provided in this Code section, the commissioner of community health shall submit an estimate of the date such funds shall no longer be available for investment. When the commissioner of community health wishes to withdraw funds from the trust account provided for in this Code section, he or she shall submit a request for such withdrawal in writing to the state treasurer.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 14, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 23; Ga. L. 1999, p. 592, § 19; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1474, § 7; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, §§ 2, 3/SB 296.

45-18-14.
Deductions from compensation and benefit payments of share of cost of coverage under plan of employees; payment of contributions to health insurance fund by departments, boards, and agencies of state; coverage of employee appealing discharge.

During any period in which an employee is covered under this part prior to the date of his or her retirement, there shall be withheld from each salary payment or other compensation of such employee, as his or her share of the cost of coverage under this plan, such portion of the premium or subscription charges under the terms of any contract or contracts issued in accordance with this part as may be established by the board. During any month in which benefits are being paid by the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to an individual so covered under this program, contributions in the amounts prescribed by the board shall be deducted from such payments with the consent of the recipient. The various departments, boards, and agencies of the executive and judicial branches of state government shall contribute to the health insurance fund such portions of the cost of such benefits as may be established by the board and the Governor as funds become available in each department, board, and agency, in addition to an amount to be established by the board to defray the cost of administration and the state’s portion of the cost of benefits payable for annuitants. The legislative fiscal officer shall contribute to the health insurance fund as an employer payment for and on behalf of all members of the General Assembly and its administrative and clerical personnel. The Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia shall contribute to the fund as an employer payment for and on behalf of district attorneys, assistant district attorneys, and other paid state personnel appointed pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 15. The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia shall contribute to the fund as an employer payment for and on behalf of secretaries and law clerks of the superior courts of the state. The amount of such contributions shall be such portions of the costs of such benefits as may be established by the board; and, in addition thereto, an amount to be established by the board shall be contributed to defray the costs of administration. The board shall determine whether such employer portion shall be determined based upon a percentage of the total outlay for personal services or determined on an amount per employee electing coverage under the plan based on the coverage elected, in accordance with the appropriation of funds.

If an employee has been eligible for coverage under the state health insurance plan for a period of ten years and is discharged from employment and the discharge is under appeal to the State Personnel Board, such employee shall be entitled to continue coverage by paying the employee contribution under the health insurance plan until the State Personnel Board has rendered a decision or for a period of six months, whichever is less.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 11; Ga. L. 1962, p. 51, § 3; Ga. L. 1963, p. 277, § 2; Ga. L. 1970, p. 9, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 332, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 199, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 667, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 425, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 413, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 623, § 7/SB 284; Ga. L. 2008, p. 577, § 20/SB 396; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

Law reviews.

For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments regarding Georgia’s insurance laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 117 (1979).

45-18-15.
Rules and regulations for administration of part; board to recommend to General Assembly schedule of maximum fees for hospitals and practitioners.

The board shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be required for the effective administration of this part. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, rules and regulations establishing the conditions under which employees who originally rejected coverage may acquire coverage at a later date. The commissioner of community health, as executive officer of the board, shall employ such personnel as may be needed to carry out this part and such employees shall be employees of the Department of Community Health. The pro rata share of the costs of operating the Department of Community Health in the manner prescribed by law shall be a part of the administrative costs of the employees’ health insurance plan.

The board shall investigate fees of hospitals, pharmacists, and practitioners of the healing arts and present recommendations to the General Assembly by not later than January 15, 1991, for a schedule of maximum fees for hospitals and practitioners of the healing arts. The recommended fees for hospitals shall be determined based upon a statistical analysis of the peer groups adjusted for the intensity of the case mix for hospitals of same licensure classification or subclassification (e.g., general, pediatric, psychiatric, rehabilitation, etc.) and of similar services in the same geographic area. The recommended fee schedule shall not be at the average of the usual and customary charges if the board determines that the average represents an unreasonably high or low charge.

The recommended fees for practitioners of the healing arts and pharmacists shall be determined based upon a statistical analysis of the peer groups for such practitioners and pharmacists of the same licensure classification (e.g., internists, family practitioners, cardiologists, neurosurgeons, etc.) and of similar services in the same geographic area. The recommended fee schedule shall not be at the average of the usual and customary charges if the board determines that the average represents an unreasonably high or low charge.

The recommendations shall include an analysis of all hospitals, pharmacists, and practitioners accepting assignment of benefits for such services not to exceed the amount authorized by the fee schedule. The board shall publish in print or electronically a list of practitioners that accept assignment of benefits under the plan.

The recommendations shall include an analysis of the impact of practitioners agreeing to provide medical or surgical services at a reduced rate for members of the health insurance plan and of pharmacists and hospitals agreeing to provide hospital services, medical equipment, or pharmaceuticals at a reduced rate for members of the health insurance plan. The board shall publish in print or electronically a list of practitioners of the healing arts, pharmacists, and hospitals that offer a reduced rate for members and the rate at which those services, equipment, or pharmaceuticals have been offered.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 12; Ga. L. 1962, p. 51, § 4; Ga. L. 1964, p. 196, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1924, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 23; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, a comma was inserted following “e.g.” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

45-18-16.
Certification of employer payment percentage for ensuing fiscal year; provision in budgets for funds for employer payments.

Not less than 30 days prior to the commencement of the plan year, the commissioner of community health shall certify to the director or chief administrative officer of each state department, bureau, institution, board, commission, or authority having employees covered by this part the amount of percentage adopted by the board as employer payments for the ensuing fiscal year; and they shall, in their annual budget, make provisions for funds with which to pay the board the required employer payments.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 14; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 23; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 11/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

45-18-17.
Employees to become members of plan unless coverage rejected or waived; withdrawal from plan by persons covered by Social Security medical care.

All persons who become state employees as defined in this part and who are eligible as specified in the rules and regulations of the board shall become members of this health insurance program unless the employee rejects or waives such coverage in writing.

Any annuitant or person appointed to an emeritus position or any person eligible to be covered by the medical care for the aged program of the Social Security Administration, which person is included in the coverage of any health insurance plan established as provided in this part, may withdraw from such plan and discontinue his coverage thereunder in such manner as may be provided by rules and regulations promulgated and adopted by the board. In the event any such annuitant or person appointed to an emeritus position withdraws from such plan and discontinues his coverage thereunder, coverage of his spouse and dependent child or children shall likewise be withdrawn and coverage thereunder discontinued.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 15; Ga. L. 1964, p. 196, § 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 279, § 3; Ga. L. 1979, p. 667, § 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1148, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, “this part” was substituted for “this article” in this Code section.

45-18-18.
Discharge of certain debts or obligations due health insurance fund.

It is the purpose of this Code section to authorize a procedure whereby the commissioner of community health may administratively discharge a debt or obligation due the health insurance fund for employees of the state when the amount is $400.00 or less and:

It is manifest that the debt or obligation is uncollectable; or

The costs of collecting the debt or obligation would be equal to or greater than the amount due the fund.

In order to conserve the health insurance funds, the commissioner of community health is authorized to develop a procedure that complies with the policies prescribed by the state accounting officer for the administrative discharge of any debt or obligation due the insurance fund when such debt or obligation is $400.00 or less. This provision shall not be construed to deny to the commissioner the authority to pursue the collection of any debt, obligation, or claim in any amount whatsoever when such pursuit is in the best interest of the insurance fund.

Upon a formal determination that a debt or obligation to the insurance fund of $400.00 or less is uncollectable, or that the costs of collection would equal or exceed the amount due the fund, the commissioner of community health shall execute and transmit to the state accounting officer a certification which includes the following: a recapitulation of the efforts made to collect the debt or obligation; an estimate of the costs to pursue collection of the debt or obligation administratively or judicially; such other information as may be required by the procedure developed by the commissioner and the state accounting officer; and a statement that further collection effort would be detrimental to the financial interests of the fund. The certification shall be made under oath or affirmation and shall be sent to the state accounting officer at such times as shall be prescribed in the procedure developed by the commissioner and the state accounting officer. Upon receipt of the certification, the state accounting officer shall be authorized to approve the removal of such uncollectable amounts from the financial records of the fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 397, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 23; Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 37/HB 293.

45-18-19.
Confidentiality of claim forms and records.

Claim forms and other records which would disclose the nature of the health services provided to an insured shall be maintained on a confidential basis by the health insurance plan. No person shall disclose such records or information to any other person except as necessary for the proper administration of the health insurance plan.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1148, § 4.

45-18-20.
Fiscal note required for bills impacting employees’ health insurance plans.

Any bill prepared by the General Assembly which would impact the state employees’ health insurance plan established under this part shall require a fiscal note in accordance with the procedures of Code Section 28-5-42.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 12/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

45-18-21.
Deposit of employer and retiree contributions into the Georgia Retiree Health Benefit Fund.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part, the board shall deposit into the Georgia Retiree Health Benefit Fund created by Code Section 45-18-101 the individual contributions by retirees and the employer contributions respecting retirees provided for by this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 77, § 3/SB 172; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to the House Asthma Strategic Planning Study Committee; membership; reports. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 12/HB 1372.